Utah statutes.
41-12a-513.   Payment of judgment in installments.

(1)  A judgment debtor upon due notice to the judgment creditor may apply to the court in which the judgment was rendered for the privilege of paying the judgment in installments.  The court, in its discretion and without prejudice to any other legal remedies the judgment creditor may have, may so order and fix the amounts and times of payment of the installments.

(2)  Subject to Subsection (3), the department may not suspend a license, registration, or a nonresident's operating privilege, and it shall restore them if previously suspended for nonpayment of a judgment, if the judgment debtor:

(a)  obtains orders under Subsection (1) as to all unsatisfied judgments; and

(b)  provides and maintains proof of owner's or operator's security.

(3)  If the judgment debtor fails to pay any installment as specified by an order under Subsection (1), then upon notice of that default, the department shall suspend the license, registration, or nonresident's operating privilege of the judgment debtor until the judgment is satisfied.

